Washington statutes.
RCW 30A.04.330

Saturday closing authorized.

Any bank, which term for the purpose of this section shall include but not be limited to any state bank, national bank or association, mutual savings bank, savings and loan association, federal reserve bank, federal home loan bank, and federal savings and loan association, federal credit union, and state credit union doing business in this state, may remain closed on Saturdays and any Saturday on which a bank remains closed shall be, with respect to such bank, a holiday and not a business day. Any act, authorized, required or permitted to be performed at or by or with respect to any bank, as herein defined, on a Saturday, may be performed on the next succeeding business day, and no liability or loss of rights of any kind shall result from such closing.

[ 2014 c 37 s 129; 1955 c 33 s 30.04.330. Prior: 1947 c 221 s 1; Rem. Supp. 1947 s 3292a. Formerly RCW 30.04.330.]